Colorado, session 2026A, HB1244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-1-107.5, amend (1),
(4)(c)(II), (4)(d)(II.5)(A), (4)(d)(II.5)(B), and (6)(d) as follows:
25-1-107.5. Additional authority of department - rules -
remedies against nursing facilities - criteria for recommending
assessments for civil penalties - cooperation with department of health
care policy and financing - nursing home penalty cash fund - nursing
home innovations grant board - reports - transfer of contracts to the
department.
(1) For the purposes of AS USED IN this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(a) Repealed. "BENEFIT RESIDENTS OF NURSING FACILITIES" MEANS
THAT A GRANT HAS A DIRECT IMPACT ON THE RESIDENTS OF NURSING
FACILITIES OR HAS AN INDIRECT IMPACT ON THE RESIDENTS THROUGH
EDUCATION OR TRAINING OF NURSING FACILITY STAFF.
(b) "Federal regulations for participation" means the regulations
found in part 442 of title 42 of the code of federal regulations, as amended,
for participation under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as
amended. "BOARD" MEANS THE NURSING HOME INNOVATIONS GRANT
BOARD, AUTHORIZED BY SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION.
(b.5) "Benefit residents of nursing facilities" means that a grant has
a direct impact on the residents of nursing facilities or has an indirect
impact on the residents through education of nursing facility staff.
(b.7) "Board" means the nursing home innovations grant board,
authorized by subsection (6) of this section.
(c) "Nursing facility" means any skilled or intermediate nursing care
facility that receives federal and state funds under Title XIX of the federal
"Social Security Act", as amended. "DEPARTMENTS" MEANS THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING.
(d) "FEDERAL REGULATIONS FOR PARTICIPATION" MEANS THE
REGULATIONS FOUND IN PART 442 OF TITLE 42 OF THE CODE OF FEDERAL
REGULATIONS, AS AMENDED, FOR PARTICIPATION UNDER TITLE XIX OF THE
FEDERAL "SOCIAL SECURITY ACT", AS AMENDED.
(e) "NURSING FACILITY" MEANS ANY SKILLED OR INTERMEDIATE
NURSING CARE FACILITY THAT RECEIVES FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDS UNDER
TITLE XIX OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL SECURITY ACT", AS AMENDED.
(4) (c) The departments shall consider, as a basis for distribution
from the nursing home penalty cash fund, the following:
(II) Grants to be approved for measures AND PROJECTS that will
benefit residents of nursing facilities by fostering innovation and improving
the quality of life and care at the facilities, including, but not limited to: IN
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1244

ACCORDANCE WITH PRIORITIES AND ALLOWABLE USES IDENTIFIED BY THE
FEDERAL CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES.
(A) Consumer education to promote resident-centered care in
nursing facilities;
(B) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)
(C) Initiatives in nursing facilities related to the quality measures
promoted by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services and
other national quality initiatives;
(D) Education and consultation for purposes of identifying and
implementing resident-centered care initiatives in nursing facilities; and
(E) Projects that support or compliment statewide quality and safety
goals of the departments.
(d) (II.5) (A) The board shall make recommendations for the
approval of grants, that benefit residents of nursing facilities for at least one
year and not more than three-year cycles. The projects awarded via grants
must be portable, sustainable, and replicable in other nursing facilities
WHICH RECOMMENDATIONS MUST BE CONSISTENT WITH THE PROCESSES FOR
GRANT CYCLES OF, AND PRIORITIES AND ALLOWABLE USES IDENTIFIED BY,
THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES.
(B) The department and the board shall develop processes for grant
payments, which processes may allow grant payments to be made in
advance of the delivery of goods and services to grantees. Grantees
receiving advance payments shall report progress to the board. No state
agency, nor any other governmental entity, with the exception of a facility
that is owned or operated by a governmental agency and that is licensed as
a nursing care facility under section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(I)(A), may apply for
or receive a grant under this subsection (4).
(6) (d) By October 1 ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 of each year, the
departments, with the assistance of the board, shall jointly submit a report
to the governor and the health and human services committee of the senate
and the public health care and human services committee of the house of
representatives, of the general assembly, or their successor committees,
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1244

regarding the expenditure of moneys MONEY in the nursing home penalty
cash fund for the purposes described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (c)
of subsection (4) SUBSECTION (4)(c)(II) of this section. The report must
detail the amount of moneys MONEY expended for such purposes, the
recipients of the funds MONEY, the effectiveness of the use of the funds
MONEY, and any other information deemed pertinent by the departments or
requested by the governor or the committees. Notwithstanding the
requirement in section 24-1-136 (11), C.R.S., the report required REPORTING
REQUIREMENT DESCRIBED in this paragraph (d) SUBSECTION (6)(d) continues
indefinitely.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1244

(2) This act applies to distributions from the nursing home penalty
cash fund made on or after the applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1244